Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-926
General academic transfer programs, defined.

General academic transfer programs shall mean those one-year or two-year degree-credit programs, at the associate degree level or below including liberal arts and sciences degrees or courses, intended by the offering institution for transfer into a baccalaureate program. Programs in this category may include the award of a formal degree upon completion of the program.

Laws 1978, LB 756, § 10;

Laws 1993, LB 239, § 11.